zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房工具/用具 > 铲子/勺子: 咖啡勺; 曲奇勺; 冰淇淋勺; 冰勺; 蔬果挖球器; 爆米花/薯条铲
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > เครื่องมือและเครื่องใช้ในครัว > ช้อนตัก: ช้อนตักกาแฟ; ที่ตักคุกกี้; ที่ตักไอศกรีม; ที่ตักน้ำแข็ง; ที่ตักเมลอนให้เป็นลูกกลมๆ; ที่ตักข้าวโพดคั่วและมันฝรั่งทอด
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Ferramentas e utensílios de cozinha > Conchas: Colheres dosadoras para café; Colheres dosadoras para cookies; Conchas de sorvete; Pazinhas para gelo; Boleadores de melão; Pá para pipoca e batata frita
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Кухонная утварь > Кухонные ложки и совки: Ложки для кофе; Ложки для печенья; Ложки для мороженого; Совки для льда; Ложки-нуазетки; Совки для попкорна и картофеля фри
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Tools & Utensils > Scoops: Coffee Scoops; Cookie Scoops; Ice Cream Scoops; Ice Scoops; Melon Ballers; Popcorn & French Fry Scoops
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Kuhinjski alati i pribor > Žlice grabilice: Žlice za kavu; Grabilica za kolačiće; Žlice za sladoled; Žlice za led; Žlice za dinje; Žlice za kokice i pomfrit
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン用品・調理器具 > スクープ: コーヒースクープ; クッキースクープ; アイスクリームスクープ; アイススコップ; メロンボーラー; ポップコーン・フライドポテト用スクープ
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房工具和用具 > 挖勺: 咖啡豆勺; 餅乾勺; 冰淇淋勺; 冰淇淋挖杓; 水果挖球器; 薯條鏟
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Narzędzia i sprzęty kuchenne > Łyżki do nabierania: Miarki do kawy; Łyżki do ciastek; Łyżki do lodów; Szufelki do lodu; Łyżki do melonów; Łopatki do popcornu i frytek
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės įrankiai > Kaušeliai: Kavos kaušeliai; Sausainių kaušeliai; Ledų kaušeliai; Ledo kaušeliai; Kaušeliai arbūzų rutuliukams; Kaušeliai kukurūzų spragėsiams ir gruzdintoms bulvytėms
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhai eszközök és edények > Fagyis kanalak: Kávémérő kanalak; Kekszadagoló kanalak; Jégkrémkanalak; Jégkanalak; Dinnyekanalak; Popcorn- és sültkrumpli-kanalak
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Strumenti e utensili cucina > Cucchiai da servizio: Misurini da caffè; Cucchiai per biscotti; Palette per gelato; Palette ghiaccio; Cucchiai per melone; Schiumaiola per fritti e pop-corn
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Kuhinjska orodja in pripomočki > Lopatke: Žličke za kavo; Zajemalke za piškote; Lopatke za sladoled; Lopatke za led; Žlice za sadno pulpo; Lopatke za pokovko in ocvrt krompirček
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Кухненски инструменти и прибори > Загребващи лъжички: Загребващи лъжички за кафе; Лъжички за бисквитки; Загребващи лъжички за сладолед; Загребващи лопатки за лед; Загребващи лъжички за диня и пъпеш; Загребващи лопатки за пуканки и пържени картофи
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Kjøkkenverktøy og bestikk > Serveringsskjeer: Kaffeskjeer; Isskjeer; Iskremskjeer; Isskjeer; Melonskjeer; Popcorn- og pommes frites-skjeer
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Ferramentas e utensílios de cozinha > Colheres fundas: Colheres medidoras de café; Colheres para biscoitos; Colheres para gelado; Colheres para gelo; Corta bolas de melão; Pás para batatas fritas e pipocas
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiövälineet ja tarvikkeet > Kauhavälineet: Kahvimitat; Keksikauhat; Jäätelökauhat; Jääkauhat; Melonikauhat; Popcorn- ja ranskanperunakauhat
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Εργαλεία & σκεύη κουζίνας > Κουτάλες/σέσουλες: Μεζούρες καφέ; Κουτάλες μπισκότων; Κουτάλες παγωτού; Κουτάλες πάγου; Σφαιρικοί κόπτες πεπονιού; Κουτάλες για τηγανητές πατάτες
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Dụng cụ nhà bếp > Muỗng xúc: Muỗng cà phê; Muỗng múc bột bánh quy; Muỗng múc kem; Muỗng xúc kem; Muỗng múc trái cây; Dụng cụ múc bỏng ngô và khoai tây chiên
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské nástroje a vybavení > Velké lžíce: Lopatky na kávu; Pomůcky na tvarování sušenek; Lžíce na zmrzlinu; Lopatky na led; Vykrajovače na meloun; Lopatky na hranolky a popcorn
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Köksverktyg och köksgeråd > Skopor: Kaffeskopor; Kakskopor; Glasskopor; Isskopor; Melonskopor; Skopor för popcorn och pommes frites
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Keukengereedschap > Opscheplepels: Koffiescheppen; Koekjesschepjes; IJsscheppen; IJslepels; Meloenlepels; Scheppen voor popcorn en friet
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Instrumente și ustensile de bucătărie > Linguri speciale: Linguri pentru cafea; Linguri dozatoare pentru biscuiți; Linguri pentru înghețată; Linguri pentru gheață; Linguri pentru pepene verde; Palete pentru popcorn și cartofi prăjiți
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방용품 > 스쿱: 커피 스쿱; 쿠키 스쿱; 아이스크림 스쿱; 아이스 스쿱; 멜론 볼러; 팝콘/프렌치프라이 스쿱
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Gereçleri ve Aletleri > Kepçeler: Kahve Ölçü Kaşıkları; Kurabiye Kaşıkları; Dondurma Kepçeleri; Buz Kürekleri; Kavun Kaşıkları; Patlamış Mısır ve Patates Kızartması Kepçeleri
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Herramientas y utensilios de cocina > Cucharas para bolas: Cucharas medidoras de café; Cucharas para masa de galletas; Cucharas de helados; Palas para hielo; Cucharas cortamelón; Palas para palomitas y patatas fritas
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenredskaber > Opøserskeer: Kaffeskeer; Cookie-skeer; Iskugleskeer; Isskeer; Melonkugleskeer; Skovle til popcorn og pommes frites
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Ustensiles et accessoires de cuisine > Pelles: Cuillères à café; Cuillères à biscuits; Cuillères à glace; Cuillères à glaçons; Cuillères parisiennes; Pelles à frites et pop-corn
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Kuchynské náradie a riad > Naberačky: Naberačky na kávu; Naberačky na sušienky; Naberačky na zmrzlinu; Naberačky na ľad; Vykrajovače na melón; Lopatky na pukance a hranolky
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Küchenhelfer & -utensilien > Portionierer: Kaffeemesslöffel; Keks-Portionierer; Eiscremeportionierer; Eisportionierer; Kugelausstecher; Popcorn- & Pommesschaufeln